Hawaii statutes.
§328-74 Flour, wrapped bread, rolls,
standard for. It shall be unlawful to sell or offer for sale, in this
State, for human consumption therein, any flour or wrapped white bread or rolls
meeting the requirements of sections 328-72 and 328-73 which fail to conform to
the labeling requirements of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, and the
regulations promulgated thereunder, with respect to such product when
introduced in interstate commerce; provided this section shall not apply to
white bread or rolls which bear no labeling of any kind and which are sold
directly to the consumer by the manufacturer thereof. [L 1945, c 101, §4; RL
1955, §51-58; HRS §328-74]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next